Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 3. General Obligation and Construction of Contract.

Sec. 45.02.301.
General obligations of parties.

The obligation of the seller is to transfer and deliver, and that of the buyer to accept and pay, in accordance with the contract.

History.

(§ 2.301 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.302.
Unconscionable contract or clause.

If the court as a matter of law finds the contract or a clause of the contract was unconscionable at the time it was made, the court may refuse to enforce the contract, enforce the remainder of the contract without the unconscionable clause, or so limit the application of an unconscionable clause as to avoid an unconscionable result.

If it is claimed or appears to the court that the contract or any clause of the contract may be unconscionable, the parties shall be given a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to its commercial setting, purpose, and effect to aid the court in making the determination.

History.

(§ 2.302 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.303.
Allocation or division of risks.

Where this chapter allocates a risk or a burden as between the parties “unless otherwise agreed,” the agreement may not only shift the allocation but may also divide the risk or burden.

History.

(§ 2.303 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 378 et seq.

Sec. 45.02.304.
Price payable in money, goods, realty, or otherwise.

The price can be made payable in money or otherwise. If it is payable in whole or in part in goods, each party is a seller of the goods that the party is to transfer.

Even though all or part of the price is payable in an interest in realty, the transfer of the goods and the seller’s obligations with reference to them are subject to this chapter but not the transfer of the interest in realty or the transferor’s obligations in connection with the transfer of the real interest.

History.

(§ 2.304 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 605 et seq.

Sec. 45.02.305.
Open price term.

The parties if they so intend can conclude a contract for sale even though the price is not settled. In this case the price is a reasonable price at the time for delivery if

nothing is said as to price;

the price is left to be agreed by the parties and they fail to agree; or

the price is to be fixed in terms of an agreed market or other standard as set or recorded by a third person or agency and it is not so set or recorded.

A price to be fixed by the seller or by the buyer means a price for the party to fix in good faith.

If a price left to be fixed otherwise than by agreement of the parties fails to be fixed through fault of one party, the other party has the option to treat the contract as cancelled or fix a reasonable price.

If, however, the parties intend not to be bound unless the price is fixed or agreed and it is not fixed or agreed, there is no contract. In this case the buyer must return goods already received or if unable so to do must pay their reasonable value at the time of delivery and the seller must return any portion of the price paid on account.

History.

(§ 2.305 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 111 et seq.

Construction and application of UCC § 2-305 dealing with open price term contracts, 91 ALR3d 1237.

Sec. 45.02.306.
Output, requirements, and exclusive dealings.

A term that measures the quantity by the output of the seller or the requirements of the buyer means such actual output or requirements as may occur in good faith, except that no quantity unreasonably disproportionate to a stated estimate or, in the absence of a stated estimate, to a normal or otherwise comparable prior output or requirements may be tendered or demanded.

A lawful agreement by either the seller or the buyer for exclusive dealing in the kind of goods concerned imposes, unless otherwise agreed, an obligation by the seller to use best efforts to supply the goods and by the buyer to use best efforts to promote their sale.

History.

(§ 2.306 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.307.
Delivery in single lot or several lots.

Unless otherwise agreed, all goods called for by a contract for sale must be tendered in a single delivery and payment is due only on this tender, but, where the circumstances give either party the right to make or demand delivery in lots, the price if it can be apportioned may be demanded for each lot.

History.

(§ 2.307 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.308.
Absence of specified place for delivery.

Unless otherwise agreed

the place for delivery of goods is the seller’s place of business or if the seller has none the seller’s residence; but

in a contract for sale of identified goods that to the knowledge of the parties at the time of contracting are in some other place, that place is the place for their delivery; and

documents of title may be delivered through customary banking channels.

History.

(§ 2.308 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.309.
Absence of specific time provisions; notice of termination.

The time for shipment or delivery or any other action under a contract if not provided in this chapter or agreed upon is a reasonable time.

If the contract provides for successive performances but is indefinite in duration, it is valid for a reasonable time, but, unless otherwise agreed, may be terminated at any time by either party.

Termination of a contract by one party except on the happening of an agreed event requires that reasonable notification be received by the other party. An agreement dispensing with notification is invalid if its operation would be unconscionable.

History.

(§ 2.309 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, §§ 267, 268.

Sec. 45.02.310.
Open time for payment or running of credit; authority to ship under reservation.

Unless otherwise agreed,

payment is due at the time and place at which the buyer is to receive the goods even though the place of shipment is the place of delivery;

if the seller is authorized to send the goods, the seller may ship them under reservation and may tender the documents of title, but the buyer may inspect the goods after their arrival before payment is due unless inspection is inconsistent with the terms of the contract (AS

45.02.513

);

if delivery is authorized and made by way of documents of title other than by (2) of this section, then payment is due, regardless of where the goods are to be received, at the time

and place at which the buyer is to receive delivery of the tangible documents; or

the buyer is to receive delivery of the electronic documents and at the seller’s place of business or, if the seller does not have a place of business, the seller’s residence; and

if the seller is required or authorized to ship the goods on credit, the credit period runs from the time of shipment, but postdating the invoice or delaying its dispatch correspondingly delays the starting of the credit period.

History.

(§ 2.310 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 15 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, rewrote (3), adding “, regardless of where the goods are to be received,” following “payment is due”, adding the (A) and (B) designations, in (A) substituted “and place at which the buyer is to receive delivery of the tangible documents;” for “and place at which the buyer is to receive the documents regardless of where the goods are to be received;”; added (3)(B); made related stylistic changes.

Sec. 45.02.311.
Options and cooperation respecting performance.

An agreement for sale that is otherwise sufficiently definite (AS

45.02.204(c)

) to be a contract is not made invalid by the fact that it leaves particulars of performance to be specified by one of the parties. The specification must be made in good faith and within limits set by commercial reasonableness.

Unless otherwise agreed, specifications relating to assortment of the goods are at the buyer’s option and, except as otherwise provided in AS

45.02.319(a)(3)

and (c), specifications or arrangements relating to shipment are at the seller’s option.

If the specification would materially affect the other party’s performance but is not seasonably made or if one party’s cooperation is necessary to the agreed performance of the other but is not seasonably forthcoming, the other party in addition to all other remedies

is excused for a resulting delay in the party’s own performance; and

may either proceed to perform in a reasonable manner or, after the time for a material part of the party’s own performance, treat the failure to specify or to cooperate as a breach by failure to deliver or accept the goods.

History.

(§ 2.311 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, §§ 131, 141.

Sec. 45.02.312.
Warranty of title and against infringement; buyer’s obligation against infringement.

Subject to (b) of this section there is in a contract for sale a warranty by the seller that

the title conveyed shall be good, and its transfer rightful; and

the goods shall be delivered free from a security interest or other lien or encumbrance of which the buyer at the time of contracting has no knowledge.

A warranty under (a) of this section will be excluded or modified only by specific language or by circumstances that give the buyer reason to know that the person selling does not claim title in the seller or that the person is purporting to sell only such right or title as the person selling or a third person may have.

Unless otherwise agreed, a seller who is a merchant regularly dealing in goods of the kind warrants that the goods shall be delivered free of the rightful claim of a third person by way of infringement or the like, but a buyer who furnishes specifications to the seller must hold the seller harmless against any such claim that arises out of compliance with the specifications.

History.

(§ 2.312 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.313.
Express warranties by affirmation, promise, description, sample.

Express warranties by the seller are created as follows:

an affirmation of fact or promise made by the seller to the buyer that relates to the goods and becomes part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the goods shall conform to the affirmation or promise;

a description of the goods that is made part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the goods shall conform to the description;

a sample or model that is made part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the whole of the goods shall conform to the sample or model.

It is not necessary to the creation of an express warranty that the seller use formal words such as “warrant” or “guarantee” or that the seller have a specific intention to make a warranty, but an affirmation merely of the value of the goods or a statement purporting to be merely the seller’s opinion of commendation of the goods does not create a warranty.

History.

(§ 2.313 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.314.
Implied warranty: Merchantability; usage of trade.

Unless excluded or modified (AS

45.02.316

), a warranty that the goods shall be merchantable is implied in a contract for their sale if the seller is a merchant with respect to goods of that kind. Under this section the serving for value of food or drink to be consumed either on the premises or elsewhere is a sale.

Goods to be merchantable must at least

pass without objection in the trade under the contract description;

in the case of fungible goods, be of fair average quality within the description;

be fit for the ordinary purposes for which the goods are used;

run, within the variations permitted by the agreement, of even kind, quality, and quantity within each unit and among all units involved;

be adequately contained, packaged, and labeled as the agreement requires; and

conform to the promises or affirmations of fact made on the container or label.

Unless excluded or modified (AS

45.02.316

), other implied warranties may arise from course of dealing or usage of trade.

History.

(§ 2.314 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.315.
Implied warranty: Fitness for particular purpose.

If the seller at the time of contracting has reason to know a particular purpose for which the goods are required and that the buyer is relying on the seller’s skill or judgment to select or furnish suitable goods, there is, unless excluded or modified under AS

45.02.316

, an implied warranty that the goods shall be fit for that purpose.

History.

(§ 2.315 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.316.
Exclusion or modification of warranties.

Words or conduct relevant to the creation of an express warranty and words or conduct tending to negate or limit warranty shall be construed where reasonable as consistent with each other; but, subject to the provisions on parol or extrinsic evidence (AS

45.02.202

), negation or limitation is inoperative to the extent that such construction is unreasonable.

Subject to (c) of this section, to exclude or modify the implied warranty of merchantability or any part of it the language must mention merchantability and in case of a writing must be conspicuous, and to exclude or modify an implied warranty of fitness the exclusion must be by a writing and conspicuous. Language to exclude all implied warranties of fitness is sufficient if it states, for example, that “There are no warranties which extend beyond the description on the face of this instrument.”

Notwithstanding (b) of this section,

unless the circumstances indicate otherwise, all implied warranties are excluded by expressions like “as is,” “with all faults,” or other language that in common understanding calls the buyer’s attention to the exclusion of warranties and makes plain that there is no implied warranty; and

when the buyer, before entering into the contract, has examined the goods or the sample or model as fully as the buyer desired or has refused to examine the goods, there is no implied warranty with regard to defects that an examination ought in the circumstances to have revealed to the buyer; and

an implied warranty can also be excluded or modified by course of dealing or course of performance or usage of trade.

Remedies for breach of warranty can be limited in accordance with the provisions on liquidation or limitation of damages and on contractual modification of remedy (AS

45.02.718

and

45.02.719

).

Implied warranties of merchantability and fitness are not applicable to a contract for the sale of human blood, blood plasma or other human tissue or organs from a blood bank or reservoir of tissue or organs. The blood, blood plasma, tissue, or organs may not, for the purposes of this chapter, be considered commodities subject to sale or barter, but shall be considered medical services.

History.

(§ 2.316 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 1968)

Editor’s notes. —

Subsection (e), which was added by the 1968 amendment, is not part of the official text of the Uniform Commercial Code.

Sec. 45.02.317.
Cumulation and conflict of warranties express or implied.

Warranties whether express or implied shall be construed as consistent with each other and as cumulative, but if that construction is unreasonable the intention of the parties determines which warranty is dominant.
In ascertaining that intention the following rules apply:

exact or technical specifications displace an inconsistent sample or model or general language of description;

a sample from an existing bulk displaces inconsistent general language of description;

an express warranty displaces an inconsistent implied warranty other than an implied warranty of fitness for a particular purpose.

History.

(§ 2.317 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.318.
Third-party beneficiaries of warranties express or implied.

A seller’s warranty whether express or implied extends to a natural person who is in the family or household of the buyer or who is a guest in the buyer’s home if it is reasonable to expect that the person may use, consume, or be affected by the goods and who is injured in person by breach of the warranty. A seller may not exclude or limit the operation of this section.

History.

(§ 2.318 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.319.
F.O.B. and F.A.S. terms.

Unless otherwise agreed, the term F.O.B., which means “free on board”, at a named place, even though used only in connection with the stated price, is a delivery term under which,

when the term is F.O.B. the place of shipment, the seller must at that place ship the goods in the manner provided in AS

45.02.504

and bear the expense and risk of putting them into the possession of the carrier; or

when the term is F.O.B. the place of destination, the seller must, at the expense and risk of the seller, transport the goods to that place and there tender delivery of them in the manner provided in AS

45.02.503

;

when under either (1) or (2) of this subsection the term is also F.O.B. vessel, car, or other vehicle, the seller must in addition, at the expense and risk of the seller, load the goods on board; if the term is F.O.B. vessel, the buyer must name the vessel and in an appropriate case the seller must comply with the provisions on the form of bill of lading (AS

45.02.323

).

Unless otherwise agreed, the term F.A.S. vessel (which means “free alongside”) at a named port, even though used only in connection with the stated price, is a delivery term under which the seller must

at the expense and risk of the seller deliver the goods alongside the vessel in the manner usual in that port or on a dock designated and provided by the buyer; and

obtain and tender a receipt for the goods in exchange for which the carrier is under a duty to issue a bill of lading.

Unless otherwise agreed, in a case falling within (a)(1) or (3) or (b) of this section, the buyer must seasonably give needed instructions for making delivery, including when the term is F.A.S. or F.O.B. the loading berth of the vessel and in an appropriate case its name and sailing date. The seller may treat the failure of needed instructions as a failure of cooperation under AS

45.02.311

. The seller also has the option to move the goods in a reasonable manner preparatory to delivery or shipment.

Under the term F.O.B. vessel or F.A.S., unless otherwise agreed, the buyer must make payment against tender of the required documents and the seller may not tender or the buyer demand delivery of the goods in substitution for the documents.

History.

(§ 2.319 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.320.
C.I.F. and C. & F. terms.

The term C.I.F. means that the price includes in a lump sum the cost of the goods and the insurance and freight to the named destination. The term C. & F. or C.F. means that the price so includes cost and freight to the named destination.

Unless otherwise agreed and even though used only in connection with the stated price and destination, the term C.I.F. destination or its equivalent requires the seller at the expense and risk of the seller to

put the goods into the possession of a carrier at the port for shipment and obtain a negotiable bill or bills of lading covering the entire transportation to the named destination; and

load the goods and obtain a receipt from the carrier, which may be contained in the bill of lading, showing that the freight has been paid or provided for; and

obtain a policy or certificate of insurance, including war risk insurance, of a kind and on terms then current at the port of shipment in the usual amount, in the currency of the contract, shown to cover the same goods covered by the bill of lading and providing for payment of loss to the order of the buyer or for the account of whom it may concern; but the seller may add to the price the amount of the premium for war risk insurance; and

prepare an invoice of the goods and procure any other documents required to effect shipment or to comply with the contract; and

forward and tender with commercial promptness all the documents in due form and with the endorsement necessary to perfect the buyer’s rights.

Unless otherwise agreed, the term C. & F. or its equivalent has the same effect and imposes upon the seller the same obligations and risks as a C.I.F. term except the obligation as to insurance.

Under the term C.I.F. or C. & F., unless otherwise agreed, the buyer must make payment against tender of the required documents and the seller may not tender or the buyer demand delivery of the goods in substitution for the documents.

History.

(§ 2.320 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.321.
C.I.F. or C. & F.: “Net landed weights”; “payment on arrival”; warranty of conditions on arrival.

Under a contract containing a term C.I.F. or C. & F.,

if the price is based on or is to be adjusted according to “net landed weights,” “delivered weights,” “out turn” quantity or quality, or the like, unless otherwise agreed, the seller must reasonably estimate the price; the payment due on tender of the documents called for by the contract is the amount so estimated, but after final adjustment of the price a settlement must be made with commercial promptness;

an agreement described in (1) of this section, or a warranty of quality or condition of the goods on arrival places upon the seller the risk of ordinary deterioration, shrinkage, and the like in transportation, but has no effect on the place or time of identification to the contract for sale or delivery or on the passing of the risk of loss;

unless otherwise agreed, if the contract provides for payment on or after arrival of the goods, the seller must before payment allow such preliminary inspection as is feasible; but if the goods are lost, delivery of the documents and payment are due when the goods should have arrived.

History.

(§ 2.321 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.322.
Delivery “ex-ship.”

Unless otherwise agreed, a term for delivery of goods “ex-ship”, which means from the carrying vessel, or in equivalent language is not restricted to a particular ship and requires delivery from a ship that has reached a place at the named port of destination where goods of the kind are usually discharged.

Under such a term, unless otherwise agreed,

the seller must discharge all liens arising out of the carriage and furnish the buyer with a direction that puts the carrier under a duty to deliver the goods; and

the risk of loss does not pass to the buyer until the goods leave the ship’s tackle or are otherwise properly unloaded.

History.

(§ 2.322 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

67 Am. Jur. 2d, Sales, § 520.

Sec. 45.02.323.
Form of bill of lading required in overseas shipment; “overseas.”

Where the contract contemplates overseas shipment and contains a term C.I.F. or C. & F. or F.O.B. vessel, the seller, unless otherwise agreed, must obtain a negotiable bill of lading stating that the goods have been loaded on board or, in the case of a term C.I.F. or C. &. F., received for shipment.

Where, in a case within (a) of this section, a tangible bill of lading has been issued in a set of parts, unless otherwise agreed, if the documents are not to be sent from abroad, the buyer may demand tender of the full set; otherwise only one part of the bill of lading need be tendered. Even if the agreement expressly requires a full set,

due tender of a single part is acceptable within the provisions on cure of improper delivery (AS

45.02.508(a)

); and

even though the full set is demanded, if the documents are sent from abroad, the person tendering an incomplete set may nevertheless require payment upon furnishing an indemnity that the buyer in good faith considers adequate.

A shipment by water or by air or a contract contemplating the shipment is “overseas” insofar as by usage of trade or agreement it is subject to the commercial, financing, or shipping practices characteristic of international deep water commerce.

History.

(§ 2.323 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 16 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (b), added “tangible” preceding “bill of lading has been issued”, and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 45.02.324.
“No arrival, no sale” term.

Under a term “no arrival, no sale” or terms of like meaning, unless otherwise agreed,

the seller must properly ship conforming goods and if they arrive by any means the seller must tender them on arrival, but the seller assumes no obligation that the goods will arrive unless the seller has caused the nonarrival; and

if without fault of the seller the goods are in part lost or have so deteriorated as no longer to conform to the contract or arrive after the contract time, the buyer may proceed as if there had been casualty to identified goods (AS

45.02.613

).

History.

(§ 2.324 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

Construction and effect of UCC § 2-613 governing casualty to goods identified to a contract, without fault of buyer or seller, 51 ALR4th 537.

Sec. 45.02.325.
“Letter of credit” term; “confirmed credit.”

Failure of the buyer seasonably to furnish an agreed letter of credit is a breach of the contract for sale.

The delivery to seller of a proper letter of credit suspends the buyer’s obligation to pay. If the letter of credit is dishonored, the seller may on seasonable notification to the buyer require payment directly from the buyer.

Unless otherwise agreed, the term “letter of credit” or “banker’s credit” in a contract for sale means an irrevocable credit issued by a financing agency of good repute and, if the shipment is overseas, of good international repute. The term “confirmed credit” means that the credit must also carry the direct obligation of such an agency that does business in the seller’s financial market.

History.

(§ 2.325 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.02.326.
Sale on approval and sale or return; rights of creditors.

Unless otherwise agreed, if delivered goods may be returned by the buyer even though they conform to the contract, the transaction is

a “sale on approval” if the goods are delivered primarily for use; and

a “sale or return” if the goods are delivered primarily for resale.

Goods held on approval are not subject to the claims of the buyer’s creditors until acceptance; goods held on sale or return are subject to such claims while in the buyer’s possession.

An “or return” term of a contract for sale is to be treated as a separate contract for sale within the statute of frauds section (AS

45.02.201

), and as contradicting the sale aspect of the contract within the provisions on parol or extrinsic evidence (AS

45.02.202

).

Whenever an artist delivers or causes to be delivered a work of fine art of the artist’s creation to an art dealer for the purpose of sale, or exhibition and sale to the public on a commission or fee or other basis of compensation, the work of fine art is not subject to the claims of the art dealer’s creditors. For the purposes of this subsection,

“art dealer” means a person other than a public auctioneer engaged in the business of selling works of fine art;

“artist” means the creator of a work of fine art;

“fine art” includes a painting, sculpture, drawing, photograph, or work of graphic art.

History.

(§ 2.326 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 1979; am § 9 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For additional provisions related to artist-art dealer relationships, see AS

45.65.200

.

Collateral references. —

Consignment transactions under the Uniform Commercial Code, 40 ALR3d 1078.

Sec. 45.02.327.
Special incidents of sale on approval and sale or return.

Under a sale on approval, unless otherwise agreed,

although the goods are identified to the contract, the risk of loss and the title do not pass to the buyer until acceptance;

use of the goods consistent with the purpose of trial is not acceptance, but failure seasonably to notify the seller of election to return the goods is acceptance, and, if the goods conform to the contract, acceptance of any part is acceptance of the whole; and

after due notification of election to return, the return is at the seller’s risk and expense but a merchant buyer must follow reasonable instructions.

Under a sale or return, unless otherwise agreed,

the option to return extends to the whole or a commercial unit of the goods while in substantially their original condition, but must be exercised seasonably; and

the return is at the buyer’s risk and expense.

History.

(§ 2.327 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

Goods in “sale or return” transaction under U.C.C. § 2-327, 66 ALR3d 190.

Sec. 45.02.328.
Sale by auction.

In a sale by auction if goods are put up in lots each lot is the subject of a separate sale.

A sale by auction is complete when the auctioneer so announces by the fall of the hammer or in other customary manner. Where a bid is made while the hammer is falling in acceptance of a prior bid, the auctioneer has discretion to reopen the bidding or declare the goods sold under the bid on which the hammer was falling.

A sale by auction is with reserve unless the goods are in explicit terms put up without reserve. In an auction with reserve, the auctioneer may withdraw the goods at any time until the auctioneer announces completion of the sale. In an auction without reserve, after the auctioneer calls for bids on an article or lot, that article or lot cannot be withdrawn unless no bid is made within a reasonable time. In either case a bidder may retract a bid until the auctioneer’s announcement of completion of the sale, but a bidder’s retraction does not revive any previous bid.

If the auctioneer knowingly receives a bid on the seller’s behalf or the seller makes or procures such a bid, and notice has not been given that liberty for the bidding is reserved, the buyer has the option to avoid the sale or take the goods at the price of the last good faith bid before the completion of the sale. This subsection does not apply to a bid at a forced sale.

History.

(§ 2.328 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Collateral references. —

7 Am. Jur. 2d, Auctions and Auctioneers, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 45.02.350.
Sale by door-to-door solicitation.

A contract for the purchase of goods or services in the amount of $10 or more from a person soliciting a door-to-door sale shall require, as a condition of taking effect, that the purchaser may revoke the offer to buy within five business days of entering into the contract, and that the seller, at the time of the sale, give the purchaser written notice of the right to revoke. Revocation is effective either upon the tender of the rejected goods to the seller or an agent of the seller, or upon the posting of a registered letter (marked Deliver to Addressee Only, Return Receipt) of rejection to the seller or an agent of the seller.

The cost of returning rejected goods shall be borne by the seller.

A “door-to-door sale” occurs when the seller, or a representative of the seller, personally solicits the sale and the purchaser’s agreement or offer to purchase is made at a place other than the place of business of the seller. The term “door-to-door sale” does not include a transaction

made under prior negotiations in the course of a visit by the buyer to a retail business establishment having a fixed permanent location where the goods are exhibited or the services are offered for sale on a continuing basis;

in which the buyer has initiated the contact and the goods or services are needed to meet a bona fide immediate personal emergency of the buyer;

conducted and consummated entirely by mail;

in which the buyer has initiated the contact and specifically requested the seller to visit the buyer’s home for the purpose of repairing or performing maintenance upon the buyer’s personal property; or

conducted at the purchaser’s place of business.

As used in (c) of this section, “personally” means in person or by telephone.

History.

(§ 1 ch 54 SLA 1970; am §§ 2, 3 ch 183 SLA 1975)

Cross references. —

For failure to comply with this section as an unlawful trade practice, see AS

45.50.471(b)

.

Editor’s notes. —

This section is not part of the official text of the Uniform Commercial Code.

Collateral references. —

Applicability of warranty of fitness under UCC § 2-315 to supplies or equipment used in performance of service contract, 47 ALR4th 238.